Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2611
Fees and expenses of arbitration.

Unless otherwise provided in the agreement to arbitrate, the arbitrators' expenses and fees together with other expenses, not including counsel fees, incurred in the conduct of the arbitration shall be paid as provided in the award.

Laws 1987, LB 71, § 11.